California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) Twenty-five percent of the amount available pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be available to the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 31160) of Division 21).

(e) The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy for grants and expenditures for the protection, restoration, and improvement of coastal forest watersheds, including managed forest lands, forest reserve areas, redwood forests, and other forest types. Eligible project types shall include projects that improve water quality and supply, increase coastal watershed storage capacity, reduce fire risk, provide habitat for fish and wildlife, or improve coastal forest health. 

(f) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available to
 the State Coastal Conservancy for acquisition of parcels that will allow for protection and restoration of coastal dune, wetland, upland, and forest habitat associated with estuarine lagoons and designated wildlife areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80121.

In implementing Section 80120, the administering entity may give special consideration to the acquisition of lands that are in deferred certification areas of local coastal plans or that complement natural community conservation plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Climate Preparedness, Habitat Resiliency, Resource Enhancement, and Innovation [80130. - 80137.]

80130.

The sum of four hundred forty-three million dollars ($443,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, as competitive grants for projects that plan, develop, and implement climate adaptation and resiliency projects. Eligible projects shall improve a community’s ability to adapt to the unavoidable impacts of climate change, improve and protect coastal and rural economies, agricultural viability, wildlife corridors, or habitat, develop future recreational opportunities, or enhance drought tolerance, landscape resilience, and water retention.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80131.

In implementing Section 80130, special consideration may be given to the acquisition of lands that are in deferred certification areas of local coastal plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80132.

(a) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) shall be available to the Wildlife Conservation Board for direct expenditures pursuant to the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code) and for grants for any of the following:

(1) Projects for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, protection, and expansion of wildlife corridors and open space, including projects to improve connectivity and reduce barriers between habitat areas. In awarding grants pursuant to this paragraph, the Wildlife Conservation Board shall give priority to projects that protect wildlife corridors, including wildlife corridors
 threatened by urban development.

(2) Projects for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, protection, and expansion of habitat that promote the recovery of threatened and endangered species.

(3) Projects to improve climate adaptation and resilience of natural systems.

(4) Projects to protect and improve existing open-space corridors and trail linkages related to utility, transportation, or water infrastructure that provide habitat connectivity and public access or trails.

(5) Projects for wildlife rehabilitation facilities after consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(6) Projects to control invasive plants or insects that degrade wildlife corridors or
 habitat linkages, inhibit the recovery of threatened or endangered species, or reduce the climate resilience of a natural system.

(7) Projects to enhance wildlife habitat, recognizing the highly variable habitat needs required by fish and wildlife. Eligible projects include acquisition of water or water rights from willing sellers, acquisition of land that includes water rights or contractual rights to water, short- or long-term water transfers and leases, projects that provide water for fish and wildlife, projects that improve aquatic or riparian habitat conditions, or projects to benefit salmon and steelhead.

(8) Implementation of conservation actions and habitat enhancement actions that measurably advance the conservation objectives of regional conservation investment strategies approved pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game
 Code. 

(9) Provision of hunting and other wildlife-dependent recreational opportunities to the public through voluntary agreement with private landowners, including opportunities pursuant to Section 1572 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) In implementing this section, the Wildlife Conservation Board may provide matching grants for incentives to landowners for conservation actions on private lands or use of voluntary habitat credit exchange mechanisms. A matching grant shall not exceed 50 percent of the total cost of the incentive program.

(c) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, protection, and expansion of wildlife corridors and open space to improve
 connectivity and reduce barriers between habitat areas and to protect and restore habitat associated with the Pacific Flyway. In awarding grants pursuant to this subdivision, priority may be given to projects that protect wildlife corridors. Of the amount described in this subdivision, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available for the California Waterfowl Habitat Program.

(d) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, not less than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for projects to restore rivers and streams in support of fisheries and wildlife, including, but not limited to, reconnection of rivers with their flood plains, riparian and side-channel habitat restoration activities described in subdivision (b) of Section 79737 of the Water Code, and restoration and protection of upper watershed forests and meadow systems that are important for fish and
 wildlife resources. Subdivision (f) of Section 79738 of the Water Code applies to this subdivision. Of the amount available pursuant to this subdivision, at least five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available for restoration projects in the Klamath-Trinity watershed for the benefit of salmon and steelhead. Priority shall be given to projects supported by multistakeholder public or private partnerships, or both, using a science-based approach and measurable objectives to guide identification, design, and implementation of regional actions to benefit salmon and steelhead.

(e) (1) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, not less than sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) shall be available to the Wildlife Conservation Board for construction, repair, modification, or removal of transportation or water resources infrastructure to improve wildlife or fish passage. 

(2) Of the amount subject to paragraph (1), at least thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for restoration of Southern California Steelhead habitat consistent with the Department of Fish and Wildlife’s Steelhead Restoration and Management Plan and the National Marine Fisheries Service’s Southern California Steelhead Recovery Plan. Projects that remove significant barriers to steelhead migration and include other habitat restoration and associated infrastructure improvements shall be the highest priority. 

(f) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, not less than sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) shall be available to the Wildlife Conservation Board for the protection, restoration, and improvement of upper watershed lands in the Sierra Nevada and Cascade Mountains, including forest
 lands, meadows, wetlands, chaparral, and riparian habitat, in order to protect and improve water supply and water quality, improve forest health, reduce wildfire danger, mitigate the effects of wildfires on water quality and supply, increase flood protection, or to protect or restore riparian or aquatic resources. 

(g) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, at least thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Fish and Wildlife to improve conditions for fish and wildlife in streams, rivers, wildlife refuges, wetland habitat areas, and estuaries. Eligible projects include acquisition of water from willing sellers, acquisition of land that includes water rights or contractual rights to water, short- or long-term water transfers or leases, provision of water for fish and wildlife, or improvement of aquatic or riparian habitat conditions. In implementing this section, the
 Department of Fish and Wildlife may provide grants under the Fisheries Restoration Grant Program with priority given to coastal waters.

(h) The Wildlife Conservation Board shall update its strategic master plan that identifies priorities and specific criteria for selecting projects pursuant to subdivision (a).

(i) Activities funded pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the state’s climate adaptation strategy, as provided in Section 71153, and the statewide objectives provided in Section 71154.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80133.

(a) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, forty million dollars ($40,000,000) shall be available for deposit into the California Ocean Protection Trust Fund, established pursuant to Section 35650, for projects that assist coastal communities, including those reliant on commercial fisheries, with adaptation to climate change, including projects that address ocean acidification, sea level rise, or habitat restoration and protection, including, but not limited to, the protection of coastal habitat associated with the Pacific Flyway.

(b) Thirty-five percent of the amount available pursuant to this section shall be available to the San Francisco Bay Area Conservancy Program (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with
 Section 31160) of Division 21).

(c) Twelve percent of the amount available pursuant to this section shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy to fund a conservation program at West Coyote Hills.

(d) The remainder of the amount available pursuant to this section shall be available pursuant to Section 31113.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80134.

(a) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to plan, develop, and implement innovative farm and ranch management practices and protections that improve climate adaptation and resiliency by improving the soil health, carbon sequestration, and habitat of California’s farm and ranch lands and affiliated habitat, including working lands, open space, or riparian corridors, and that increase water retention and absorption, habitat values, species protection, and economic viability to reduce development pressure.

(b) Of the amount subject to this section, the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Food and Agriculture for grants to
 promote practices on farms and ranches that improve agricultural and open-space soil health, carbon soil sequestration, erosion control, water quality, and water retention.

(c) (1) Of the amount subject to this section, the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Conservation to protect, restore, or enhance working lands and riparian corridors through conservation easements or other conservation actions, including actions pursuant to Section 9084 and the California Farmland Conservancy Program (Division 10.2 (commencing with Section 10200)).

(2) Up to fifty percent of the funds available pursuant to this subdivision may be allocated to the Department of Conservation for watershed restoration and conservation projects on agricultural lands pursuant to Section 9084.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80135.

(a) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, except as provided in subdivision (c), for projects that provide ecological restoration of forests. Projects may include, but are not limited to, forest restoration activities that include hazardous fuel reduction, postfire watershed rehabilitation, prescribed or managed burns, acquisition of forest conservation easements or fee interests, and forest management practices that promote forest resilience to severe wildfire, climate change, and other disturbances. The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall achieve geographic balance with the moneys allocated pursuant to this section and may, where appropriate, include activities on lands
 owned by the United States.

(b) Not less than 30 percent of the amount available pursuant to this section shall be allocated for urban forestry projects pursuant to Section 4799.12. The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall allocate no less than 50 percent of the moneys allocated pursuant to this subdivision for the expansion of the urban forestry program to previously underserved local entities in order to achieve geographic balance.

(c) Of the amount subject to this section, 50 percent shall be allocated directly to the Sierra Nevada Conservancy to administer projects pursuant to this section for purposes of implementing the Sierra Nevada Watershed Improvement Program. For purposes of this section, the Sierra Nevada Conservancy may allocate funds to the California Tahoe Conservancy for projects within the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80136.

Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, forty million dollars ($40,000,000) shall be available to the California Conservation Corps for projects to rehabilitate or improve local and state parks, restore watersheds and riparian zones, regional and community-level fuel load reduction, compost application and food waste management, resources conservation and restoration projects, and for facility or equipment acquisition, development, restoration, and rehabilitation. Not less than 50 percent of the amount available pursuant to this section shall be allocated for grants to certified local community conservation corps, as defined in Section 14507.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80137.

(a) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80130, sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) shall be made available to the Natural Resources Agency for competitive grants to local agencies, nonprofit organizations, nongovernmental land conservation organizations, federally recognized Native American tribes, or nonfederally recognized California Native American tribes listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission, to do any of the following:

(1) Restore, protect, and acquire Native American, natural, cultural, and historic resources within the state.

(2) Convert and repurpose properties or parts of properties that
 served as the site of a fossil fuel powerplant that had been retired on the effective date of this division, or were scheduled to be retired prior to January 1, 2021, to create permanently protected open space, tourism, and park opportunities through fee title or conservation easements.

(3) Enhance visitor experiences through development, expansion, and improvement of science centers operated by foundations or other nonprofit organizations in heavily urbanized areas. 

(4) Enhance park, water, and natural resource values through improved recreation, tourism, and natural resource investments in those areas of the state not within the jurisdiction of a state conservancy.

(5) Promote, develop, and improve any of the following:

(A) Community, civic, or
 athletic venues.

(B) Cultural or visitor centers that recognize that contributions of California’s ethnic communities or celebrate the unique traditions of these communities, including those of Asian and Hispanic descent.

(C) Visitor centers or nonprofit aquariums that educate the public about natural landscapes, aquatic species, or wildlife migratory patterns.

(b) Of the amount subject to this section, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available for multibenefit green infrastructure investments in or benefiting disadvantaged or severely disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Clean Drinking Water and Drought Preparedness [80140. - 80140.]

80140.

(a) The sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes described in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 79720) of Division 26.7 of the Water Code.

(b) Of the funds authorized by subdivision (a), thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available for grants to regional water supply projects within the San Joaquin River hydrologic unit that diversify local water supplies by providing local surface water to communities that are dependent on contaminated groundwater, reduce municipal groundwater pumping, and benefit agricultural and municipal water supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.1. Groundwater Sustainability [80141. - 80141.]

80141.

(a) The sum of eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the state board for competitive grants for projects for treatment and remediation activities that prevent or reduce the contamination of groundwater that serves as a source of drinking water.

(b) Projects shall be prioritized based upon the following criteria:

(1) The threat posed by groundwater contamination to the affected community’s overall drinking water supplies, including an urgent need for treatment of alternative supplies or increased
 water imports if groundwater is not available due to contamination. For the purposes of this paragraph, treatment includes ongoing operation and maintenance of existing facilities.

(2) The potential for groundwater contamination to spread and impair drinking water supply and water storage for nearby population areas.

(3) The potential of the project, if fully implemented, to enhance local water supply reliability.

(4) The potential of the project to maximize opportunities to recharge vulnerable, high-use groundwater basins and optimize groundwater supplies.

(5) The project addresses contamination at a site for which the courts or the appropriate regulatory authority has not yet identified responsible parties, or where the identified responsible parties are unwilling or unable to pay for the total cost of cleanup, including water supply reliability improvement for critical urban water supplies in designated superfund areas with groundwater contamination listed on the National Priorities List established pursuant to Section 105(a)(8)(B) of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605(a)(8)(B)).

(c) Funding authorized by this chapter shall not be used to pay any share of the costs of remediation recovered from parties responsible for the contamination of a groundwater storage aquifer, but may be used to pay costs
 that cannot be recovered from responsible parties. Parties that receive funding for remediating groundwater storage aquifers shall exercise reasonable efforts to recover the costs of groundwater cleanup from the parties responsible for the contamination. Funds recovered from responsible parties may only be used to fund treatment and remediation activities including operations and maintenance. 

(d) The contaminants that may be addressed with funding pursuant to this chapter may include, but shall not be limited to, nitrates, perchlorate, MTBE (methyl tertiary butyl ether), arsenic, selenium, hexavalent chromium, mercury, PCE (perchloroethylene), TCE (trichloroethylene), DCE (dichloroethene), DCA (dichloroethane), 1,2,3-TCP (trichloropropane), carbon tetrachloride, 1,4-dioxane, 1,4-dioxacyclohexane, nitrosodimethylamine, bromide, iron, manganese, and uranium. 

(e) A project that receives funding pursuant to this chapter shall be selected by a competitive grant process with added consideration for those projects that leverage private, federal, or local funding. 

(f) For the purposes of awarding funding under this chapter, a local cost share of not less than 50 percent of the total costs of the project shall be required. The cost-sharing requirement may be waived or reduced for projects that directly benefit a disadvantaged community or an economically distressed area.

(g) The state board may assess the capacity of a community to pay for the operation and maintenance of a facility to be funded by a grant awarded under this chapter.

(h) At least 10 percent of the funds available pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated for projects serving severely disadvantaged communities.

(i) Funding authorized by this chapter may include funding for technical assistance to disadvantaged communities. The agency administering this funding shall operate a multidisciplinary technical assistance program for small and disadvantaged communities. 

(j) Subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code do not apply to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.5. Flood Protection and Repair [80145. - 80145.]

80145.

(a) The sum of five hundred fifty million dollars ($550,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for flood protection and repair.

(1) (A) Of the funds available pursuant to this subdivision, three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Water Resources for flood protection facilities, levee improvements, and related investments that protect persons and property from flood damage in the Central Valley. The Department of Water Resources may require that moneys provided under this paragraph be matched by local and regional public agencies.

(B) Of the amount subject to this paragraph, fifty
 million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available for levee repairs and restoration within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(C) Of the amount subject to this paragraph, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be available for multibenefit projects that achieve public safety improvements and measurable fish and wildlife enhancement. The Department of Water Resources shall coordinate the expenditure of multibenefit funds with the Central Valley Flood Protection Board and the Department of Fish and Wildlife. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, levee setbacks, creation or enhancement of flood plains or bypasses, groundwater recharge projects in flood plains, and land acquisition and easements necessary for these projects.

(2) Of the funds available pursuant to this subdivision, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available for the purposes of
 stormwater, mudslide, and other flash-flood-related protections.

(3) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency for competitive grants for the purposes of multibenefit projects in urbanized areas to address flooding. Eligible projects shall include, but are not limited to, stormwater capture and reuse, planning and implementation of low-impact development, restoration of urban streams and watersheds, and increasing permeable surfaces to help reduce flooding.

(4) Funding made available pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) shall support projects that protect persons and property from flood damage. Unless the project has been identified as serving a disadvantaged community, an entity that receives an award pursuant to paragraphs (2) or (3) shall be required to provide a match
 of 25 percent as a local share.

(b) Funds provided by this chapter shall not be expended to pay the costs of the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of Delta conveyance facilities. Those costs shall be the responsibility of the water agencies that benefit from the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of those facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.6. Regional Sustainability for Drought and Groundwater, and Water Recycling [80146. - 80147.]

80146.

(a) The sum of two hundred ninety million dollars ($290,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for drought and groundwater investments to achieve regional sustainability. Expenditure of these funds may include planning, design, and implementation projects through competitive grants and loans for investments in groundwater recharge with surface water, stormwater, recycled water, and other conjunctive use projects, and projects to prevent or clean up contamination of groundwater that serves as a source of drinking water.

(b) Of the funds made available pursuant to this section, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 79770) of Division 26.7 of the Water
 Code for the purposes described in Section 79775 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80147.

(a) The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 79765) of Division 26.7 of the Water Code, except that the provisions of Section 79143 of the Water Code shall not apply to a loan or grant awarded under this section.

(b) Of the funds made available pursuant to this section, up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available for the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program administered by the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Advance Payment for Water Projects [80150. - 80150.]

80150.

(a) Within 90 days of notice that a grant under this division for projects included and implemented in an integrated regional water management plan has been awarded, the regional water management group shall provide the administering agency with a list of projects to be funded with the grant funds where the project proponent is a nonprofit organization or a disadvantaged community, or the project benefits a disadvantaged community. The list shall specify how the projects are consistent with the adopted integrated regional water management plan and shall include all of the following information:

(1) Descriptive information concerning each project identified.

(2) The names of the
 entities that will receive the funding for each project, including, but not limited to, an identification as to whether the project proponent or proponents are nonprofit organizations or a disadvantaged community.

(3) The budget of each project.

(4) The anticipated schedule for each project.

(b) Within 60 days of receiving the project information pursuant to subdivision (a), the administering agency may provide advance payment of 50 percent of the grant award for those projects that satisfy both of the following criteria:

(1) The project proponent is a nonprofit organization or a disadvantaged community, or the project benefits a disadvantaged community.

(2) The grant award for the project
 is less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(c) Funds advanced pursuant to subdivision (b) shall comply with the following requirements:

(1) The recipient shall place the funds in a noninterest-bearing account until expended.

(2) The funds shall be spent within six months of the date of receipt, unless the administering agency waives this requirement.

(3) The recipient shall, on a quarterly basis, provide an accountability report to the administering agency regarding the expenditure and use of any advance grant funds that provides, at a minimum, the following information:

(A) An itemization as to how advance payment funds provided under this section have been expended.

(B) A project itemization as to how any remaining advance payment funds provided under this section will be expended over the period specified in paragraph (2).

(C) A description of whether the funds are placed in a noninterest-bearing account, and if so, the date that occurred and the dates of withdrawals of funds from that account, if applicable.

(4) If funds are not expended, the unused portion of the grant shall be returned to the administering agency within 60 days after project completion or the end of the grant performance period, whichever is earlier.

(5) The administering agency may adopt additional requirements for the recipient regarding the use of the advance payment to ensure that the funds are used
 properly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Fiscal Provisions [80160. - 80173.]

80160.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000), and any additional bonds authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with this division pursuant to other provisions of law, not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 80172, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this division and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, issued, and delivered, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the
 principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the committee pursuant to this section. The bonds shall be sold upon the terms and conditions specified in a resolution to be adopted by the committee pursuant to Section 16731 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80161.

The bonds authorized by this division shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as amended from time to time, and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80162.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), of the bonds authorized by this division, the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this division, the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Finance Committee is the “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) The committee consists of the Director of Finance, the Treasurer, and the Controller. Notwithstanding
 any other law, any member may designate a representative to act as that member in his or her place for all purposes, as though the member were personally present.

(c) The Treasurer shall serve as the chairperson of the committee.

(d) A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80163.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized by this division in order to carry out the actions specified in this division and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80164.

For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, “board,” as defined in Section 16722 of the Government Code, means the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80165.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80166.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this division, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum that is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 80169, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80167.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, including other authorized forms of interim financing that include, but are not limited to, commercial paper, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code for the purpose of carrying out this division. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this division, excluding refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 80172, less any amount loaned and not yet repaid pursuant to this section and withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to Section 80169 and not yet returned to the General Fund. The board shall execute those documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain
 and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80168.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions or is otherwise entitled to any federal tax advantage, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and for the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage
 under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80169.

For the purposes of carrying out this division, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this division, excluding refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 80172, less any amount loaned pursuant to Section 80167 and not yet repaid and any amount withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to this section and not yet returned to the General Fund. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated in accordance with this division. Any moneys made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, with interest at the rate earned by the moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received
 from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80170.
